Massachusetts, session 194th, H2580.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Safe Communities Act”
SECTION 2. Chapter 147 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 62 the following section:-
Section 63. Updates to Law Enforcement Procedures
(a) Definitions
As used in this section, the following words shall have the following meanings, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise:
“Law enforcement agency”, any state, municipal, college or university police department,
sheriff’s department, correctional facility, prosecutorial office, court, probation office, or
of 6

program of one or more of the foregoing entities, or any other non-federal entity in the
commonwealth charged with the enforcement of laws or the custody of detained persons.
“Immigration enforcement”, any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in
investigating or enforcing any federal immigration law. Such purposes do not include
verification of an applicant’s eligibility for state or federal programs or services.
“United States Department of Homeland Security” or “DHS”, the United States
Department of Homeland Security and its component agencies, including Immigration and
Customs Enforcement, the former Immigration and Naturalization Service, Customs and Border
Protection, and any other federal agency charged with enforcing immigration laws.
(b) Community relations with law enforcement agencies
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no officer or employee of a
law enforcement agency, while acting under color of law, shall question persons, including
victims and witnesses of crimes, about their immigration status unless state or federal law
requires the inquiry, provided that judges and magistrates may make such inquiries as are
necessary to adjudicate matters within their jurisdictions.
(c) Due process protections
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, an interview, including any
informal questioning, between an agent of the United States Department of Homeland Security
or an officer or employee of a law enforcement agency and a person in the custody of a law
enforcement agency conducted for immigration enforcement purposes shall take place only if the
person in custody gives informed consent by signing a written consent form provided by the law
of 6

enforcement agency. The consent form shall explain that: (i) the interview is for immigration
enforcement or deportation purposes; (ii) any information provided at the interview can be used
against the person; (iii) the person may decline to sign any documents that are presented during
the interview; and (iv) the person may choose to decline the interview or to be
interviewed only with an attorney present, at the person’s own expense. The consent form shall
provide a checkbox or other means to indicate if an interview has taken place, and if so, if an
attorney was present. The consent form shall be available in English and other languages
commonly spoken in Massachusetts. The law enforcement agency shall make best efforts to
provide a consent form that is in a language that the person understands, and to provide oral
interpretation if needed, in order to obtain the person’s informed consent for the interview. The
office of the attorney general shall prepare the consent form and make it available to law
enforcement agencies, and may work with interested not-for-profit organizations to prepare
translations of the form.
Any and all records relating to the granting of these interviews or questioning shall be
public records as defined in paragraph 26 of section 7 of chapter 4, provided that names,
addresses, phone numbers and other personal identifying information shall not be a public
record. These records include the signed consent forms obtained before the interviews, and
information about whether the interview or questioning was conducted in the presence of an
attorney.
(d) The preceding subsections (b) and (c) shall not apply to interviews or questioning of
persons who are held in Massachusetts correctional facilities under an Inter-Governmental
Service Agreement with the United States Department of Homeland Security, provided,
of 6

however, that persons who are booked into a correctional facility under such an agreement shall
be advised at the booking that the person (i) has the right to seek legal counsel from an
immigration attorney at their own expense; (ii) may choose to decline to speak with a DHS agent
or to speak with the DHS agent only with an attorney present; and (iii) may decline to sign any
documents presented by a DHS agent.
(e) Guidelines for reporting release information
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no officer or employee of a
law enforcement agency shall initiate communication with the United States Department of
Homeland Security about the pending or imminent release, from state, local or county custody,
of a person who is being released for any reason other than the end of a sentence of incarceration
for a criminal conviction; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall prohibit or restrain
any state or local agency from sending to, or receiving from, any local, state, or federal agency,
information regarding citizenship or immigration status.
If a law enforcement agency receives a request for notification from the United States
Department of Homeland Security regarding a person in its custody, including a request for
notification under to federal form I-247A or I-247N, the law enforcement agency shall inform
the person of the request and shall provide the person with a copy of the request and copies of
any other documentation pertaining to the person’s case that is presented to the law enforcement
agency by the United States Department of Homeland Security.
(f) Implementation and training
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, all law enforcement agencies
in the commonwealth shall, within 12 months of passage of this act, incorporate information and
of 6

guidance regarding this section into their regular introductory and in-service training programs.
An individual may file a complaint for a violation of this section with the corresponding
department or agency, which shall investigate the complaint. At the conclusion of the
investigation, the agency head shall provide the executive office of public safety and security
with a written summary of the investigation’s findings. If the agency head substantiates the
allegations, the written summary shall provide details of the specific actions taken to correct the
violation as well as details of the sanctions imposed on the subjects of the investigation, if any.
Findings made under this subsection shall be public records as defined in paragraph 26 of section
7 of chapter 4, provided that personal identifying information shall not be a public record.
SECTION 3. Chapter 126 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 39 the following section:-
Section 40. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no officer or
employee of the department of corrections, the state police, any sheriff’s department, or any city
or town police department shall perform the functions of an immigration officer, whether
pursuant to 8 U.S.C. section 1357(g) or any other law, regulation, or policy, whether formal or
informal. Any agreements in existence at the time of the passage of the law that are inconsistent
with this section are null and void. Any entity of the commonwealth or any political subdivision
thereof that is a party to such an agreement on the date of the passage of this act shall, within 90
days, inform the other party or parties that the contract is null and void under Massachusetts law.
Nothing in this section shall prohibit the department of correction or a house of correction from
entering into an Inter-Governmental Service Agreement with the United States Department of
Homeland Security in which persons in Immigration and Customs Enforcement custody are
of 6

housed at the house of correction and the United States Department of Homeland Security pays a
daily fee for each person detained there.
of 6